California, session 20252026, AB844.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 221.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:221.5. (a) It is the policy of the this state that elementary and secondary school classes and courses, including nonacademic and elective classes and courses, be conducted, conducted without regard to the sex of the pupil enrolled in these classes and courses.(b) A school district shall not prohibit a pupil from enrolling in any a class or course on the basis of the sex of the pupil, except a class subject to Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 51930) of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2.(c) A school district shall not require a pupil of one sex to enroll in a particular class or course, course unless the same class or course is also required of a pupil of the opposite sex.(d) A school counselor, teacher, instructor, administrator, or aide shall not, on the basis of the sex of a pupil, offer vocational or school program guidance to a pupil of one sex that is different from that offered to a pupil of the opposite sex or, in counseling a pupil, differentiate career, vocational, or higher education opportunities on the basis of the sex of the pupil counseled. Any school personnel acting in a career counseling or course selection capacity to a pupil shall affirmatively explore with the pupil the possibility of careers, or courses leading to careers, that are nontraditional for that pupil’s sex. The parents parent or legal guardian of the pupil shall be notified in a general manner at least once in the manner prescribed by Section 48980, in advance of career counseling and course selection selection, commencing with course selection for grade 7 7, so that they the parent or legal guardian may participate in the counseling sessions and decisions.(e) Participation in a particular physical education activity or sport, if required of pupils of one sex, shall be available to pupils of each sex.(f) (1) A pupil shall be permitted to participate pupil’s participation in sex-segregated school programs and activities, including athletic teams and competitions, and use facilities consistent with his or her gender identity, irrespective of the gender listed on the pupil’s records. of facilities, including bathrooms, locker rooms, showers, and overnight accommodations, shall be based upon the pupil’s sex.(2) This section shall not prohibit a pupil whose identity does not align with the pupil’s sex from participating in sex-segregated school programs and activities, including athletic teams and competitions, and using facilities, including bathrooms, locker rooms, showers, and overnight accommodations, that is based upon the pupil’s sex.(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Female” means a person whose reproductive system, as determined by anatomy and genetics at the time of birth, naturally has, had, will, will have, or would have, but for a congenital anomaly or intentional or unintentional disruption, produced eggs, whether or not eggs are produced.(2) “Male” means a person whose reproductive system, as determined by anatomy and genetics at the time of birth, naturally has, had, will, will have, or would have, but for a congenital anomaly or intentional or unintentional disruption, produced sperm, whether or not sperm is produced.(3) “Sex” means male or female.SEC. 2. Section 66271.85 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 66271.8, to read:66271.85. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section shall maintain fairness among athletes, protect equal opportunities for athletes of both sexes, and protect the dignity, privacy, and safety of students.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, including Section 67400, a student’s participation in sex-segregated athletic programs and activities and use of facilities, including bathrooms, locker rooms, showers, overnight accommodations, and student housing at a postsecondary institution shall be based upon the student’s sex.(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Postsecondary institution” means a campus of the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges, a private postsecondary educational institution, or an independent institution of higher education that receives state financial assistance.(2) “Sex” has the same meaning as defined in Section 221.5.